Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2273
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2273 to 81-2283 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Senior Volunteer Program Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 18.
August 24, 2017